Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 10. Controlled Substances
§ 35-7-1018.
Substances included in Schedule III.

The controlled substances listed in this section are included in Schedule III. Schedule III shall consist of the drugs and other substances by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name or brand name designated, listed in this section.

Stimulants. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system including its salts, isomers (whether optical, position or geometric) and salts of such isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Those compounds, mixtures or preparations in dosage unit form containing any stimulant substances listed in Schedule II which compounds, mixtures or preparations were listed on August 25, 1971, as excepted in the Federal Register as excepted compounds under section 21 C.F.R. part 1308.32, and any other drug of the quantitative composition shown in that list for those drugs or which is the same except that it contains a lesser quantity of controlled substances;

Benzphetamine;

Chlorphentermine;

Clortermine;

Phendimetrazine.

Depressants. — Unless specifically excepted or listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system:

Any compound, mixture or preparation containing any of the following or any salt thereof, and one (1) or more other active medicinal ingredient not listed in any schedule:

Amobarbital;

Secobarbital;

Pentobarbital.

Any suppository dosage form containing any of the following or any salt thereof, and approved by the food and drug administration for marketing only as a suppository:

Amobarbital;

Secobarbital;

Pentobarbital.

Any substance which contains any quantity of a derivative of barbituric acid or any salt thereof;

Chorhexadol;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 151, § 2.

Lysergic acid;

Lysergic acid amide;

Methyprylon;

Sulfondiethylmethane;

Sulfonethylmethane;

Sulfonmethane;

Tiletamine and zolazepam or any salt thereof; some trade or other names for a tiletamine-zolazepam combination product: telazol; some trade or other names for tiletamine: 2-(ethylamino)-2-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexanone; some trade or other names for zolazepam: 4-(2-fluorophenyl)-6,8-dihydro-1,3,8-trimethylpyrazolo-[3,4-e] [1,4]-diazepin-7(1H)-one, flupyrazapon;

Ketamine, its salts, isomers and salts of isomers (some other names for ketamine include (+-)-2-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-(methylamino)-cyclohexanone);

Any drug product containing gamma hydoxybutyric acid, its salts, isomers and salts of isomers, for which an application is approved under section 505 of the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act.

Nalorphine.

Narcotic drugs. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set forth in paragraphs (i) through (viii) of this subsection:

Not more than one and eight-tenths (1.8) grams of codeine per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than ninety (90) milligrams per dosage unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium;

Not more than one and eight-tenths (1.8) grams of codeine per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than ninety (90) milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of dihydrocodeinone (hydrocodone) per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than fifteen (15) milligrams per dosage unit, with a fourfold or greater quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium;

Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of dihydrocodeinone (hydrocodone) per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than fifteen (15) milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

Not more than one and eight-tenths (1.8) grams of dihydrocodeine per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than ninety (90) milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of ethylmorphine, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than fifteen (15) milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

Not more than five hundred (500) milligrams of opium per one hundred (100) milliliters or per one hundred (100) grams, or not more than twenty-five (25) milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

Not more than fifty (50) milligrams of morphine per one hundred (100) milliliters or per one hundred (100) grams, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.

The commissioner may except by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any stimulant or depressant substance listed in subsections (b) and (c) of this section from the application of all or any part of this act if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one (1) or more active medicinal ingredients not having a stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous system.

Anabolic steroids. — For purposes of this subsection, “anabolic steroid” means any drug or hormonal substance, chemically and pharmacologically related to testosterone (other than estrogens, progestins, corticosteroids and dehydroepiandrosterone) and unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, includes any of the following or any ether, ester, salt or derivative of the following that acts in the same manner on the human body:

3[beta],17-dihydro-5a-androstane;

3[alpha],17[beta]-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;

5[alpha]-androstan-3,17-dione;

1-androstenediol (3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-ene);

1-androstenediol (3[alpha],17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-ene);

4-androstenediol (3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-androst-4-ene);

5-androstenediol (3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene);

1-androstenedione ([5[alpha]]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione);

4-androstenedione (androst-4-en-3,17-dione);

5-androstenedione (androst-5-en-3,17-dione);

Bolasterone (7[alpha],17[alpha]-dimethyl-17[beta]-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

Boldenone (17[beta]-hydroxyandrost-1,4,-diene-3-one);

Calusterone (7[beta],17[alpha]-dimethyl-17[beta],hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

Clostebol (4chloro-17[beta]-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

Dehydrochloromethyltestosterone (4-chloro-17[beta]-hydroxy-17[alpha]-methyl-androst-1,4dien-3-one);

[Delta]1-dihydrotestosterone (also known as “1-testosterone”) (17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one);

4-dihydrotestosterone (17[beta]-hydroxy-androstan-3-one);

Drostanolone (17[beta]-hydroxy-2[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]-androstan-3-one);

Ethylestrenol (17[alpha]-ethyl-17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-ene);

Fluoxymesterone (9-fluoro-17[alpha]-methyl-11[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

Formebolone (2-formyl-17[alpha]-methyl-11[alpha],17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one);

Furazabol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]-furazan);

13[beta]-ethyl-17[beta]-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one);

4-hydroxytestosterone (4,17[beta]-dihydroxy-androst-4-en-3-one);

4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone (4,17[beta]-dihydroxy-estr-4-en-3-one);

Mestanolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-5-androstan-3-one);

Mesterolone (1[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-[5[alpha]]-androstan-3-one);

Methandienone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one);

Methandriol (17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-5-ene);

Methenolone (1-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one);

17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-5a-androstane);

17[alpha]-methyl-3[alpha],17[beta]-dihydroxy-5a-androstane);

17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-4-ene);

17[alpha]-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone (17[alpha]-methyl-4-hydroxy-17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);

Methyldienolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxyestra-4,9(10)-dien-3-one);

Methyltrienolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxyestra-4,9-11-trien-3-one);

Methyltestosterone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

Mibolerone (7[alpha],17[alpha]-dimethyl-17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);

17[alpha]-methyl-[Delta]1-dihydrotestosterone (17b[beta]-hydroxy-17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one) (also known as “17-[alpha]-methyl-1-tesosterone”);

Nandrolone (17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);

19-nor-4-androstenediol (3[beta], 17[beta]-dihydroxyestr-4-ene);

19-nor-4-androstenediol (3[alpha], 17[beta]-dihydroxyestr-4-ene);

19-nor-5-androstenediol (3[beta], 17[beta]-dihydroxyestr-5-ene);

19-nor-5-androstenediol (3[alpha], 17[beta]-dihydroxyestr-5-ene);

19-nor-4-androstenedione (estr-4-en-3,17-dione);

19-nor-5-androstenedione (estr-5-en-3,17-dione);

Norbolethone (13[beta],17[alpha]-diethyl-17[beta]-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one);

Norclostebol (4-chloro-17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);

Norethandrolone (17[alpha]-ethyl-17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);

Normethandrolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);

Oxandrolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-2-oxa-[5[alpha]]-androstan-3-one);

Oxymesterone (17[alpha]-methyl-4,17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

Oxymetholone (17[alpha]-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene-17[beta]-hydroxy-[5[alpha]]-androstan-3-one);

Stanozolol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-[5[alpha]]-androst-2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole);

Stenbolone (17[beta]-hydroxy-2-methyl-[5[alpha]]-androst-1-en-3-one);

Testolactone (13-hydroxy-3-oxo-13,17-secoandrosta-1,4-dien-17-oic acid lactone);

Testosterone (17[beta]-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

Tetrahydrogestrinone (13[beta], 17[alpha]-diethyl-17[beta]-hydroxygon-4,9,11-trien-3-one);

Trenbolone (17[beta]-hydroestr-4,9,11-trien-3-one);

Boldione (androsta-1,4-diene-3,17-dione);

Desoxymethyltestosterone (17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]-androst- 2-en-17[beta]-ol)(also known as madol);

19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione (estra-4,9(10)-diene- 3,17-dione);

Any salt, ester or ether of a drug or substance described or listed in this subsection, except the term does not include an anabolic steroid which is expressly intended for administration through implants to cattle or other nonhuman species and which has been approved by the United States secretary of health and humans services for such administration. If any person prescribes, dispenses or distributes such steroid for human use, the person shall be considered to have prescribed, dispensed or distributed an anabolic steroid within the meaning of this subsection.

Hallucinogenic substances:

Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a United States Food and Drug Administration approved drug product; some other names for dronobinol include (6aR-trans)-6a,7,8,10a-tetrahydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6H-dibenzo [b,d]pyran-1-ol, or (-)-delta-9-(trans)-tetrahydrocannabinol.

Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs and their salts, as set forth below:

Buprenorphine.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.18; Laws 1973, ch. 222, § 1; 1985, ch. 114, § 1; 1991, ch. 19, § 1; 1997, ch. 151, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 88, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 40, § 1; 2011, ch. 45, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b)(i), substituted “21 C.F.R. part 1308.32” for “308.32.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (g), deleting former (i) through (xxviii) and adding present (i) through (lx); and adding (j).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (e)(iii) and (e)(iv), inserted “(hydrocodone)”; in (g)(xxiii), substituted “17[beta]” for “17[alpha]”; inserted present (g)(lx) through (g)(lxii) and redesignated former (g)(lx) as (g)(lxiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Editor's notes. —

There are no paragraphs (h)(ii), (i) or (j)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (f), see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Application. —

Laws 2011, ch. 45, § 3, provides: “The registration requirements for persons who manufacture, distribute or dispense controlled substances in Wyoming specified in
W.S.

35-7-1024

, as amended in section 1 of this act, shall apply to all registrations issued or renewed in calendar year 2011.”

For description of phencyclidine,

see Apodaca v. State, 627 P.2d 1023,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Valerio v. State, 527 P.2d 154,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1974).

§ 35-7-1019.
Findings requiring inclusion of substance in Schedule IV.

The commissioner shall place a substance in Schedule IV if he finds that:

The substance has a low potential for abuse relative to substances in Schedule III;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States; and

Abuse of the substance may lead to limited physical dependence or psychological dependence relative to the substances in Schedule III.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.19.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-7-1020.
Substances included in Schedule IV.

The controlled substances listed in this section are included in Schedule IV. Schedule IV shall consist of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name or brand name designated, listed in this section.

Narcotic drugs. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set forth in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection:

Not more than one (1) milligram of difenoxin and not less than twenty-five (25) micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;

Dextropropoxyphene (alpha -(+)-4-dimethylamino-1, 2-diphenyl-3-methyl-2- propionoxy-butane).

Depressants. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts, isomers and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Alprazolam;

Barbital;

Bromazepam;

Camazepam;

Chloral betaine;

Chloral hydrate;

Chlordiazepoxide;

Clobazam;

Clonazepam;

Clorazepate;

Clotiazepam;

Cloxazolam;

Delorazepam;

Diazepam;

Estazolam;

Ethchlorvynol;

Ethinamate;

Ethyl Loflazepate;

Fludiazepam;

Flunitrazepam;

Flurazepam;

Halazepam;

Haloxazolam;

Ketazolam;

Loprazolam;

Lorazepam;

Lormetazepam;

Mebutamate;

Medazepam;

Meprobamate;

Methohexital;

Methylphenobarbital (mephobarbital);

Nimetazepam;

Nitrazepam;

Nordiazepam;

Oxazepam;

Oxazolam;

Paraldehyde;

Petrichloral;

Phenobarbital;

Pinazepam;

Prazepam;

Temazepam;

Tetrazepam;

Triazolam;

Midazolam;

Quazepam;

Zolpidem;

Zaleplon;

Dichloralphenazone;

Zopiclone;

Fospropofol.

Fenfluramine. — Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts, isomers whether optical, position or geometric, and salts of isomers when the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible:

Fenfluramine.

Stimulants. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers and salts of isomers:

Diethylpropion;

Mazindol;

Pemoline (including organometallic complexes and chelates thereof);

Phentermine;

Pipradrol;

SPA ((-)-1-dimethylamino-1, 2-diphenylethane);

Cathine ((+)-norpseudoephedrine);

Fencamfamin;

Fenproporex;

Mefenorex;

Sibutramine;

Modafinil.

Other substances. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts:

Pentazocine;

Butorphanol (including its optical isomers);

Carisoprodol;

Tramadol.

The commissioner may except by rule any compound, mixture or preparation containing any depressant substance listed in subsection (c) of this section from the application of all or any part of this act if the compound, mixture or preparation contains one (1) or more active medicinal ingredients not having a depressant effect on the central nervous system and if the admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion or concentration that vitiate the potential for abuse of the substance which have a depressant effect on the central nervous system.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.20; Laws 1973, ch. 222, § 1; 1985, ch. 114, § 1; 1997, ch. 151, § 1; 2001, ch. 88, § 1; 2007, ch. 40, § 1; 2011, ch. 45, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (c)(l) and (c)(li), and made a related change.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (c)(xxix), substituted “Medazepam” for “Medaxepam”; and added (c)(lii), (f)(iii) and (f)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (d)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Application. —

Laws 2011, ch. 45, § 3, provides: “The registration requirements for persons who manufacture, distribute or dispense controlled substances in Wyoming specified in
W.S.

35-7-1024

, as amended in section 1 of this act, shall apply to all registrations issued or renewed in calendar year 2011.”

§ 35-7-1021.
Findings requiring inclusion of substance in Schedule V.

The commissioner shall place a substance in Schedule V if he finds that:

The substance has low potential for abuse relative to the controlled substances listed in Schedule IV;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States; and

The substance has limited physical dependence or psychological dependence liability relative to the controlled substances listed in Schedule IV.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.21.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-7-1022.
Substances included in Schedule V.

The controlled substances listed in this section are included in Schedule V. Schedule V shall consist of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name or brand name designated in this section.

Narcotic drugs containing nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients. - Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing limited quantities of any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set forth in paragraphs (i) through (vi) of this subsection which also contains one (1) or more nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in sufficient proportion to confer upon the compound, mixture or preparation valuable medicinal qualities other than those possessed by narcotic drugs alone:

Not more than two hundred (200) milligrams of codeine per one hundred (100) milliliters or per one hundred (100) grams;

Not more than one hundred (100) milligrams of dihydrocodeine per one hundred (100) milliliters or per one hundred (100) grams;

Not more than one hundred (100) milligrams of ethylmorphine per one hundred (100) milliliters or per one hundred (100) grams;

Not more than two and five-tenths (2.5) milligrams of diphenoxylate and not less than twenty-five (25) micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;

Not more than one hundred (100) milligrams of opium per one hundred (100) milliliters or per one hundred (100) grams;

Not more than five-tenths (0.5) milligram of difenoxin and not less than twenty-five (25) micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit.

Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs and their salts, as set forth below:

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 40, § 2.

Stimulants. Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers and salts of isomers:

Pyrovalerone.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 45, § 2.

Depressants. - Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts:

Lacosamide [(R)-2-acetoamido-N-benzyl-3-methoxy-propionamide];

Pregabalin [(S)-3-(aminomethyl)-5-methylhexanoic acid].

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.22; Laws 1973, ch. 222, § 1; 1985, ch. 114, § 1; 1997, ch. 151, § 1; 2007, ch. 40, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 45, §§ 1, 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted (c)(i), which read: “Buprenorphine”; and added (e).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), inserted “Narcotic drugs containing nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients”; repealed former (e), which read: “Any compound, mixture or preparation containing pregabalin [(S)-3-(aminomethyl)-5- methylhexanoic acid], including its salts, isomers and salts of isomers”; and added (f).

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (c)(ii) or (d)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Application. —

Article IV

§ 35-7-1023.
Board of pharmacy to administer registration requirements; rules; fees.

The Wyoming state board of pharmacy shall have the responsibility for administering the registration requirements of this article, and may promulgate rules and charge reasonable fees relating to the registration and control of the manufacture, distribution, and dispensing of controlled substances within this state.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.23.

§ 35-7-1024.
Registration requirements.

Every person who manufactures, distributes or dispenses any controlled substance within this state or who proposes to engage in the manufacture, distribution or dispensing of any controlled substance within this state, must obtain every two (2) years, on or before July 1, a registration issued by the board in accordance with its rules. Any registrant who fails to renew his registration by July 1 of each renewal year shall be charged a late fee. If the failure to renew continues past September 30 of the renewal year, the registration shall be cancelled and the United States drug enforcement administration notified for cancellation of the registrant’s federal registration.

Persons registered by the board under this act to manufacture, distribute, dispense, or conduct research with controlled substances may possess, manufacture, distribute, dispense, or conduct research with those substances to the extent authorized by their registration and in conformity with the other provisions of this article.

The following persons need not register and may lawfully possess controlled substances under this act:

An agent or employee of any registered manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser of any controlled substance if he is acting in the usual course of his legitimate business or employment;

A common or contract carrier or warehouseman, or an employee thereof, whose possession of any controlled substance is in the usual course of business or employment;

An ultimate user or a person in possession of any controlled substance pursuant to a lawful order of a practitioner or in lawful possession of a Schedule V substance.

The board may waive by rule the requirement for registration of certain manufacturers, distributors, or dispensers if it finds it consistent with the public health and safety.

A separate registration is required at each principal place of business or professional practice where the applicant manufactures, distributes, or dispenses controlled substances.

The board may inspect the establishment of a registrant or applicant for registration in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the board.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.24; Laws 1975, ch. 192, § 1; 1999, ch. 101, § 2; 2011, ch. 45, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “every two (2) years” for “annually,” “July 1” for “September 30,” and “renewal year” for “calendar year” twice, deleted “in the amount of forty dollars ($40.00)” at the end of the second sentence, and substituted “September 30” for “December 31” and “United States drug enforcement administration” for “bureau.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Application. —

Laws 2011, ch. 45, § 3, provides: “The registration requirements for persons who manufacture, distribute or dispense controlled substances in Wyoming specified in
W.S.

35-7-1024

, as amended in section 1 of this act, shall apply to all registrations issued or renewed in calendar year 2011.”

Dispensing of controlled substance by pharmacist outside of statutory authority. —

See Dover v. State, 664 P.2d 536,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 334

(Wyo. 1983).

Investigatory drug snares immunized. —

The acquisition, use and sale for investigatory purposes, without registration, of marijuana did not violate defendant's right to due process where the technical violations at issue were implicitly immunized under §

35-7-1043

as legitimate investigatory drug snares. Rivera v. State, 846 P.2d 1,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 35-7-1025.
Registration of manufacturers and distributors; controlled substance prescription tracking program enrollment.

The board shall register an applicant to manufacture or distribute controlled substances included in W.S.

35-7-1014

,

35-7-1016

,

35-7-1018

,

35-7-1020

and

35-7-1022

unless it determines that the issuance of that registration would be inconsistent with the public interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider the following factors:

Maintenance of effective controls against diversion of controlled substances into other than legitimate medical, scientific, or industrial channels;

Compliance with applicable state and local law;

Any convictions of the applicant under any federal and state laws relating to any controlled substance;

Past experience in the manufacture or distribution of controlled substances, and the existence in the applicant’s establishment of effective controls against diversion;

Furnishing by the applicant of false or fraudulent material in any application filed under this act;

Suspension or revocation of the applicant’s federal registration to manufacture, distribute, or dispense controlled substances as authorized by federal law; and

Any other factors relevant to and consistent with the public health and safety.

Registration under subsection (a) of this section does not entitle a registrant to manufacture and distribute controlled substances in Schedule I or II other than those specified in the registration.

Practitioners shall be registered to dispense any controlled substances or to conduct research with controlled substances in Schedules II through V if they are authorized to dispense or conduct research under the law of this state. The board need not require separate registration under this article for practitioners engaging in research with nonnarcotic controlled substances in Schedules II through V where the registrant is already registered under this article in another capacity. Practitioners registered under federal law to conduct research with Schedule I substances may conduct research with Schedule I substances within this state upon furnishing the board evidence of that federal registration. The board shall enroll any practitioner registered under this subsection in the controlled substance prescription tracking program maintained by the board under W.S.

35-7-1060

if the practitioner is authorized to dispense any controlled substances in Schedules II through V. The board may promulgate rules and regulations for purposes of enrolling those practitioners in the tracking program.

Compliance by manufacturers and distributors with the provisions of the federal law respecting registration (excluding fees) entitles them to be registered under this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 25; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.25; 2018 ch. 96, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

in (c), substituted “shall” for “must” following “Practitioners” and added the last two sentences.

Laws 2018, ch. 96, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

§ 35-7-1026.
Suspension or revocation of registration.

A registration under W.S.

35-7-1025

to manufacture, distribute or dispense a controlled substance may be suspended or revoked by the board upon a finding that the registrant:

Has furnished false or fraudulent material information in any application filed under this act;

Has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor involving moral turpitude under any state or federal law relating to any controlled substance;

Has had his federal registration suspended or revoked to manufacture, distribute or dispense controlled substances;

Has willfully violated any of the provisions of this act, or any rules and regulations relating to controlled substances;

Has failed to provide adequate security for the storage of controlled substances to the extent that repeated diversions have occurred; or

Has voluntarily surrendered his license to practice, or has had his license revoked or suspended, or the renewal thereof has been denied or lapsed for cause by his professional licensing board.

The board may limit revocation or suspension of a registration to the particular controlled substance with respect to which grounds for revocation or suspension exist.

If the board suspends or revokes a registration, all controlled substances owned or possessed by the registrant at the time of suspension or the effective date of the revocation order may be placed under seal. No disposition may be made of substances under seal until the time for taking an appeal has elapsed or until all appeals have been concluded unless a court, upon application therefor, orders the sale of perishable substances and the deposit of the proceeds of the sale with the court. Upon a revocation order becoming final, all controlled substances may be forfeited to the state.

The board shall promptly notify the bureau of all orders suspending or revoking registration and all forfeitures of controlled substances.

In the case of a revocation or suspension sought by the board’s staff under paragraph (a)(ii), (iii) or (vi) of this section, a copy of an order or other appropriate documents from a court or administrative agency, certified by the clerk, judge, secretary or executive director thereof, evidencing a revocation, suspension, voluntary suspension or conviction of a felony, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction, revocation or suspension of the federal registration, or the loss of the license to practice.

The board, by regulation, may adopt procedures under which the denial, suspension, revocation or denial of renewal of a registration may be resolved by mutual agreement between the registrant or applicant and the board’s staff, subject to prior approval by the board.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.26; Laws 1975, ch. 192, § 1; 2001, ch. 87, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

§ 35-7-1027.
Order to show cause before denial, suspension, revocation or refusal to renew registration; emergency suspension.

Before denying, suspending, or revoking a registration, or refusing a renewal of registration, the board shall serve upon the applicant or registrant an order to show cause why registration should not be denied, revoked or suspended, or why the renewal should not be refused. The order to show cause shall contain a statement of the basis therefor and shall call upon the applicant or registrant to appear before the board at a time and place not less than thirty (30) days after the date of service of the order, but in the case of a denial or renewal of registration the show cause order shall be served not later than thirty (30) days before the expiration of the registration. These proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

] without regard to any criminal prosecution or other proceeding. Proceedings to refuse renewal of registration shall not abate the existing registration which shall remain in effect pending the outcome of the administrative hearing.

The board may suspend, without an order to show cause, any registration simultaneously with the institution of proceedings under W.S.

35-7-1026

, or where renewal of registration is refused, if it finds there is imminent danger to the public health or safety which warrants this action. The suspension shall continue in effect until the conclusion of the proceedings, including judicial review thereof, unless sooner withdrawn by the board or dissolved by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.27.

§ 35-7-1028.
Records and inventories required of registrants.

Persons registered to manufacture, distribute, or dispense controlled substances under this act shall keep records and maintain inventories in conformance with the record-keeping and inventory requirements of federal law and with any additional rules the board issues.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 28; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.28.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

§ 35-7-1029.
Order forms required for distribution of substances in Schedules I and II.

Controlled substances in Schedules I and II shall be distributed by a registrant to another registrant only pursuant to an order form. Compliance with the provisions of federal law respecting order forms shall be deemed compliance with this section.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.29.

§ 35-7-1030.
Prescriptions required in certain instances.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 153, § 1.

In emergency situations, as defined by rule of the board, Schedule II drugs may be dispensed upon oral prescription of a practitioner, reduced promptly to writing and filed by the pharmacy. Prescriptions shall be retained in conformity with the requirements of W.S.

35-7-1028

. No prescription for a Schedule II substance may be refilled.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 153, § 1.

No controlled substances included in any schedule may be distributed or dispensed for other than an acceptable medical indication.

No practitioner shall prescribe nor shall any person dispense any opioid or combination of opioids for acute pain to an opioid naive patient for more than a seven (7) day supply in a seven (7) day period. The board shall by rule establish reasonable exceptions to this section, in consultation with other professional licensing boards that license practitioners, including exceptions for chronic pain, cancer treatment, palliative care and other clinically appropriate exceptions. As used in this subsection:

“Opioid” means an opiumlike compound that binds to one (1) or more of the major opioid receptors in the body;

“Opioid naive patient” means a patient who has not had an active opioid prescription in the preceding forty-five (45) day period.

On and after January 1, 2021, except when dispensed directly by a practitioner other than a pharmacy to an ultimate user, no controlled substance included in any schedule shall be dispensed without the electronic prescription of a practitioner. The prescription for a controlled substance included in Schedule III or IV shall not be filled or refilled more than six (6) months after the date of the prescription or be refilled more than five (5) times unless renewed by the practitioner. The board may by rule and regulation provide exemptions from the requirements of this subsection including exemptions for emergencies and technical failures.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 30; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.30; Laws 1975, ch. 192, § 1; 2011, ch. 45, § 1; 2019 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a) and (c), inserted “or electronic”; and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a) and (c), added the last sentence; and added (f).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, added (e).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2019 amendment,

by ch. 153, § 1, effective January 1, 2021, repealed former (a), which read, “Except when dispensed directly by a practitioner, other than a pharmacy, to an ultimate user, no controlled substance in Schedule II may be dispensed without the written or electronic prescription of a practitioner. This subsection is repealed effective January 1, 2021.”; and repealed former (c), which read, “Except when dispensed directly by a practitioner other than a pharmacy to an ultimate user, a controlled substance included in Schedule III or IV, which is a prescription drug as determined under state or federal statute, shall not be dispensed without a written, oral or electronic prescription of a practitioner. The prescription shall not be filled or refilled more than six (6) months after the date thereof or be refilled more than five (5) times, unless renewed by the practitioner. This subsection is repealed effective January 1, 2021.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Physician's liability to third person for prescribing drug to known drug addict, 42 ALR4th 586.

Article V